New York, session 2025-2026, A3371.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 115 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 115. Information on the safe storage of firearms. The information 4 developed pursuant to section eight hundred thirty-seven-y of the execu- 5 tive law relating to the safe storage of firearms shall be made avail- 6 able on the department's website and shall be provided to parents in all 7 public, nonpublic, and charter schools at the beginning of each school 8 year. 9 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-y to 10 read as follows: 11 § 837-y. Safe storage of firearms information. The division, in 12 consultation with the department of education, shall develop information 13 on the safe storage of firearms pursuant to sections 265.45 and 265.50 14 of the penal law, which is to be provided to parents in all public, 15 nonpublic, and charter schools pursuant to section one hundred fifteen 16 of the education law. The information shall be provided in a clear and 17 concise manner and translated in the six most common languages in the 18 state. Such information shall include, but not be limited to, an expla- 19 nation of the current law and how parents can obtain more information. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that section one 21 of this act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding the 22 date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02451-01-5